src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:e"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
 %^1VOW:e <=> OnSetC [e|E|ẹ:e] _  [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]  Cns:+ [%^V2VV:  %^PAL: |Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: %^Pen: %^PAL:] ;
!€ čââʹlmtẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}m^V2VV^PAL
!!€ čââʹlmtẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}m^V2VV^PAL
!!€ čââʹlmteeʹm00
!! reeʹǧǧes+A+Sg+Nom: **rich/rikas**
!€ rẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}gges^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^PALK
!!€ rẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}gges^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^PALK
!!€ rẹẹʹǧǧes0000
        OnSetC [Vow:e|Vow:E] _ (i|u) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV:  %^PAL: ;
!€ pẹ^1VOWi{ʹØ}vv^V2VV^PAL^YXX2YX
!!€ pẹ^1VOWi{ʹØ}vv^V2VV^PAL^YXX2YX
!!€ peeiʹv0000
         OnSetC i:e _  (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWLower: ;

!Distinguishing mainstam and maainstam
      Cns: Vow:e _ (u: |i:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (Vow:) Cns:+  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
      [ n | š ] Vow:e _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) ǩ %{XC%}: %^V2VV: %^PAL: ;
!€ kaađ»nẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}k{XC}^V2VV^PAL^C2CC^PALK
!!€ kaađ»nẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}k{XC}^V2VV^PAL^C2CC^PALK
!!€ kaađ»neeʹǩǩ0000
      OnSetC [E|e|ẹ:e] _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: (%^PAL:) BetweenPALNoAndMorph ;
!€ reʹhtt+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ rẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt^V2VV^PAL^YXX2VX
!!€ ree0uʹt0000

  e _ %^V2VV: ;
!! Jouste+N+Prop+Sg+Ill
!€ Jouste^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Jouste^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Joustee0ʹje


"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:å"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving
 %^1VOW:å <=>
   OnSetC [o:å|Å|O:Å] _ (u: |i: |h:u|v:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower:  ;
!   OnSetC [å|o:å|Å|O:Å] _ (u: |i: |h:u|v:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: ) ;
   OnSetC [å|Å] _ (u: |i: |h:u|v:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (Vow: [Cns:* (%{XC%}:)] %^Pen:) %^V2VV: NoVowRaise ;
!! sååbbar+N+Sg+Nom
!€ så^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!€ så^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!€ sååbbar00
!$ så%^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!$ så%^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!$ så0bbar00
  å _ %^V2VV: ;
!! radio+N+Sg+Ill
!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radioo0ʹje
   OnSetC å _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^YXX2VX: ;
!€ jå^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^PAL^YXX2VX
!!€ jå^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^PAL^YXX2VX
!!€ jåå0uʹs0000


"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:õ"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
 %^1VOW:õ <=>
     OnSetC [õ|â:õ|u:õ] _ (u: |i:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
     e õ _ (%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!     OnSetC Vow:õ _ (u: |i:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!! âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen: **boy/poika**
!€ â^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX^PALK>i
!!€ â^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX^PALK>i
!!€ õõʹlj00000>i
!! čâʹlmm+N+Pl+Acc: **eye/silmä**
!€ čâ^1VOW{ʹØ}lmm^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>id
!!€ čâ^1VOW{ʹØ}lmm^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>id
!!€ čõõʹlm00000>id
     OnSetC [u:õ|õ|â:õ] _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [ %^V2VV:  | %^Pen: %^V2VV:] ;
!     OnSetC [u:õ|õ] _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [ %^V2VV:  | %^Pen: %^V2VV:] ;
!€ ču^1VOWkk^V2VV^U2Õ>až
!!€ ču^1VOWkk^V2VV^U2Õ>až
!!€ čõõkk00>až

!Distinguishing mainstam and maainstam
      OnSetC õ _ (u: |i:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns: Cns:* Vow: [Cns:+| %{XC%}:Cns]  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;

   OnSetC [õ|Õ] _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!€ võ^1VOWrr^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ võ^1VOWrr^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ võõr000
!€ sõ^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ sõ^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ sõõl000
!€ mättʼtõ^1VOWs{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ mättʼtõ^1VOWs{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ mättʼtõõzz00
 OnSetC õ _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^YXX2VX: ;
!€ sõ^1VOWhss^V2VV^YXX2VX
!!€ sõ^1VOWhss^V2VV^YXX2VX
!!€ sõõus000


"relative vowel lengthening %{õuØ%}:õ"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{õuØ%}:õ <=>
     OnSetC %{õu%}:õ _ (u: |i:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;

  õ _ %^V2VV: ;
!! radio+N+Sg+Ill
!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radioo0ʹje

   OnSetC [u:õ|õ] _ (%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;



"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:ä"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
 %^1VOW:ä <=>
 OnSetC [ä|Ä] _ (i|:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
! OnSetC [ä|Ä] _ (i|:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ;
 OnSetC ä _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ([(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro: |%^YXX2YX:]) (%^PALK:) RBound ;
!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ ääld000
!€ jä^1VOWu{ʹØ}rr^V2VV^PAL^CC2C
!!€ jä^1VOWu{ʹØ}rr^V2VV^PAL^CC2C
!!€ jääuʹr0000
   OnSetC ä _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^YXX2VX: ;
!! mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: **pay/maksaa**
!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^YXX2VX>am
!!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^YXX2VX>am
!!€ mää0u0s000>am
!! mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: **pay/maksaa**
!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^PAL^YXX2VX>et
!!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^PAL^YXX2VX>et
!!€ mää0uʹs0000>et


 OnSetC a: _ (u|i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWLower:  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
 OnSetC ä _ (u|i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV:  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
! OnSetC [ä|a:ä] _ (u|i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: )  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
 OnSetC a: _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower:  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
 OnSetC ä _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV:  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
! OnSetC [ä|a:ä] _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: )  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
! OnSetC [å:ä|ä|a:ä] _ (h:u|u|i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: )  ;
!Distinguishing mainstam and maainstam
!- kååʹmmerd, maainâst Vowel lengthening in INDPRSSG3 and IMPSG2
    OnSetC ä _ (u|i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [%^Pen: %^V2VV: |%^IMPSG2: |%^INDPRSSG3:] ;
    OnSetC ä _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
    OnSetC ä _ (u|i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [%^Pen: %^V2VV: |%^IMPSG2: |%^INDPRSSG3:] ;
    OnSetC ä _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;

  ä _ %^V2VV: [BetweenVowHeightAndMorph | ʹ j e RBound ] ;
!! Määttä+N+Prop+Sg+Ill
!€ Määttä^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Määttä^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Määttää0ʹje


"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:a"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in MAINSTED: maainstam, mainstam
 %^1VOW:a <=>
  OnSetC (i) a _ (i|:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
!  OnSetC (i) a _ (i|:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;2024-07-19
!€ dura^1VOWk^V2VV
!!€ dura^1VOWk^V2VV
!!€ duraak0
  OnSetC ä: _ (i|:u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: ;
!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^VOWRaise^CC2C>už
!!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^VOWRaise^CC2C>už
!!€ aald0000>už
!! täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:
!€ tä^1VOWi{ʹØ}dd^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>i
!!€ tä^1VOWi{ʹØ}dd^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>i
!!€ taaiʹd00000>i

 OnSetC a _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^YXX2VX: ;
 OnSetC ä: _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^YXX2VX: ;

!! mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **pay/maksaa**
!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2VX>i
!!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2VX>i
!!€ maa0uʹs00000>i

!
  [a|A] _ (i|u)  (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (0:ʼ) Vow: Cns:* (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
!! taalkâs+N+Sg+Nom

!2016-04   [ b | ʒ | (ǯ) ǯ | (g) g | i b | i n |(k) k |l|m |(n) n | n v|r g|r| r t | u d|u l| u n | u ŋ | u r] _ s t (%^Pen: %^V2VV:) %^IMPSG2: ;
!2016-04   [ ʹ đ đ | ʹ ǩ |ʹ l|ʹ l ǩ |ʹ m m |ʹ p] _ s t %^IMPSG2: ;
   Cns: a _  i  (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
   Cns: a _  i  Cns: Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
   Cns: a _ (u: |i:) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  [%^Pen: %^V2VV: |%^IMPSG2: |%^INDPRSSG3:] ;


  a _ %^V2VV: ;
!! biologia+N+Sg+Ill
!€ biologia^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ biologia^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ biologiaa0ʹje


"Relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:o"
!! **@RULENAME@** -  simultaneous lengthening and lowering: juʹrdded > joordam juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
 %^1VOW:o <=>
   OnSetC u:o _ (%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns: - v: ] [Cns:* |:Cns*] %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower: ;
   OnSetC u:o _ [%{VU%}:u|(ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) v:] (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) [d|l|r|ʒ] %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower: ;
   OnSetC u:o _ [ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) [ v: |h:] (%{ʹØ%}:) [d d: |l l: |r r: |ʒ ʒ: |ǯ ǯ: |j j: |s s: |t t: | č č: |c c: ] ] %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower: ;

!€ u^1VOWvdd^V2VV ^VOWLower:0 ^YXX2VX>če
!!€ u^1VOWvdd^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2VX>če
!!€ ooud0000>če
!! juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1 **think**
!€ ju^1VOWrdd^V2VV ^VOWLower:0 ^YXX2YX>am
!!€ ju^1VOWrdd^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX>am
!!€ joord0000>am
 OnSetC å: _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^YXX2VX: ;
  å:o _  (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+  %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: ;
!€ kå^1VOW{ʹØ}ll^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL>in
!!€ kå^1VOW{ʹØ}ll^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL>in
!!€ kooʹll000>in
!€ tå^1VOWidd^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2YX>čed
!!€ tå^1VOWidd^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2YX>čed
!!€ tooid0000>čed
   o _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) (Vow: Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:)  %^V2VV: ;
   o _ (i|u) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) (Vow: Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:)  %^V2VV: ;
!! oolmaž+N+Sg+Nom: **person/henkilö**
!€ o^1VOWlmm^V2VV^YXX2YX>až
!!€ o^1VOWlmm^V2VV^YXX2YX>až
!!€ oolm000>až
!! Sajos+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:Sajoozz
!€ Sajo^1VOW{ʹØ}s{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ Sajo^1VOW{ʹØ}s{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ Sajoo0zz00
!$ Sajo^1VOW{ʹØ}s{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!$ Sajo^1VOW{ʹØ}s{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!$ Sajo00zz00
!! toll+N+Sg+Gen: **fire/tuli**
!€ to^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ to^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ tool000
!€ to^1VOW{ʹØ}ll^V2VV^PAL^CC2C>e
!!€ to^1VOW{ʹØ}ll^V2VV^PAL^CC2C>e
!!€ tooʹl0000>e
!€ ko^1VOWnttâr^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX
!!€ ko^1VOWnttâr^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX
!!€ koont0âr0000
  o _ %^V2VV: ;
!! radio+N+Sg+Ill
!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radioo0ʹje

"Even syllabic nouns I, relative vowel lengthening i"
!! **@RULENAME@** - ǩiđđ:ǩiiđ
 %^1VOW:i <=> OnSetC [ e:i| ẹ:i ] _ (u) (%{ʹØ%}:)  [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ: |:ˈ) Cns:+] [%^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: | Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen: %^V2VV: %^Pen: %^VOWRaise:]  ;

OnSetC [i|I] _ ((%{ʹØ%}:) h: |u) (%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ: |:ˈ) Cns:+] %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndMorph   ;
  OnSetC [Vow:i|Vow:I] _  [(ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) CNoJ: |(%{ʹØ%}:) [h: |u] (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+] Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
!! leuʹdd+N+Pl+Gen
!€ lẹ^1VOWu{ʹØ}dd^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>i
!!€ lẹ^1VOWu{ʹØ}dd^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>i
!!€ liiuʹd00000>i
!Not needed here
!! pirsted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg
!€ piirâst
!!€ piirâst
!!€ piirâst
!€ pẹ^1VOWss^V2VV^VOWRaise>už
!!€ pẹ^1VOWss^V2VV^VOWRaise>už
!!€ piiss00>už

   OnSetC [i|I] _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) CNoJ: Cns:* [ %^V2VV: | Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV:]  ;
!€ ǩi^1VOWđđ^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ ǩi^1VOWđđ^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ ǩiiđ000

  i _ %^V2VV: ;
!! Terhi+N+Prop+Sg+Ill
!€ Terhi^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Terhi^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Terhii0ʹje


"Even syllabic nouns, relative vowel extra lengthening u not followed by v"
!! **@RULENAME@** - declension of nouns kunn > kuun
 %^1VOW:u <=> [OnSetC|PenUltCns] [o:u|u] _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+  (%{XC%}:) (%^Pen: [(%^Allegro: %^Pen:) (%^PAL: %^Pen:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro: %^Pen:) (%^PAL: %^Pen:) %^CC2CAllegro:]) %^V2VV: ((%^PALE: |%^PALÄ: |%^PALẸ:) %^PAL: |%^PALNo:) BetweenPALNoAndMorph ;
!! mainstummuš+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: **story telling/tarinointi**
!€ mainstummu^1VOWš{XC}^Pen^CC2C^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ mainstummu^1VOWš{XC}^Pen^CC2C^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ mainstum0uužž0000

 OnSetC [o:u|u] _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: Cns:* (%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C: |(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:]) %^V2VV: ((%^PALE: |%^PALÄ: |%^PALẸ:) %^PAL: |%^PALNo:) [%^C2CC: | %^K2GG:] ;
 OnSetC o:u     _ (i) (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: Cns:*  %^V2VV:  %^VOWRaise:  ;
 OnSetC u (i)   _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: Cns:*  %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
         Cns: u _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)  CNoV: Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: [%>|(%^Hyphen: %- |%^NoHyphen: |%{%-Ø%}:) (∑) #: |.#.|(%^PALE: |%^PALÄ: |%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:] ;
              u _ (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (i) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ: |:ˈ) Cns:+]  Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
